Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB859.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 62 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3914. Specifications for contracts.(a) Requirements.-- No specification for a contract awarded under this chapter may be written in such a manner as to contain proprietary, exclusionary or discriminatory requirements other than those based upon performance unless : (1) the requirements are necessary to test or demonstrate a specific feature;(2) the requirements are necessary to provide for interchangeability of parts or equipment;(3) the requirements are necessary to extend or maintain compatibility with an existing system or equipment. A contract containing requirements under this paragraph shall 12345678910111213141516171819 include an explanation as to why the extension or compatibility of a system or equipment requires the specifications; or(4) no other brand or source exists.(b) Equivalent parts or equipment.--For each part or piece of equipment, the specifications shall identify the essential performance features that a brand or model must have in order to be considered an equivalent and a statement that equivalent parts or equipment will be given equal consideration.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0859PN0897 - 2 - 12345678910